Hawaii statutes.
[§141-33] Licensing.
(a) Each applicant for an industrial hemp license shall submit a signed,
complete, accurate, and legible application form provided by the board between
January 1 and April 1 of the year in which the applicant plans to
grow industrial hemp, which shall include the following:

(1) The applicant's name, mailing address, and phone
number in Hawaii and, if applicable, electronic mail address;

(2) If the applicant is an individual or partnership,
the date of birth of the individual or partners;

(3) If the applicant is any business entity other
than an individual, partnership, or institution of higher education,
documentation that the entity is authorized to do business in Hawaii;

(4) The cultivated variety that will be sown;

(5) The source and amount of certified seed to be
used;

(6) The number of acres to be cultivated for seed,
viable grain, industrial products, or any combination thereof;

(7) The global positioning system coordinates in
decimal degrees from the central most point of the growing area to be
cultivated and a map showing the location of the growing area in terms of its
address or legal description;

(8) A statement that the applicant is the owner of
the growing area to be used for the cultivation or a statement, signed by the
owner of the growing area, indicating that the owner has consented to that use;

(9) The address of the place in Hawaii where the
applicant will keep the records, books, electronic data, or other documents
that are required by this part;

(10) The name and address of each place where the
industrial hemp is to be stored, sold, or provided, indicating for each place
the form of the industrial hemp; and

(11) The applicant's acknowledgment and agreement to
the following terms and conditions:

(A) Any information obtained by the board may
be publicly disclosed and provided to law enforcement agencies without further
notice to the applicant or licensee;

(B) The applicant agrees to allow any
inspection and sampling that the board deems necessary;

(C) The applicant agrees to pay for any
sampling and analysis costs that the board deems necessary;

(D) The applicant agrees to submit all
required reports by the applicable due dates specified by the board; and

(E) The applicant and any partner, directors,
or members have not been convicted of any felony related to the possession,
production, sale, or distribution of a controlled substance in any form in this
or any other country.

(b) An application may be received beginning
on January 1 of each year and shall be signed by the applicant or, in the case
of a business entity, one of its officers, directors, or partners, as the case
may be, and indicate that all information and documents submitted in support of
the application are correct and complete to the best of the applicant's
knowledge.

(c) Any incomplete application for a license,
or an application received after April 1 of any year, shall be denied.

(d) In addition to the application form, each
applicant for a license shall submit a fee set by the chairperson. If the fee
does not accompany the application, the application for a license will be
deemed incomplete.

(e) The annual license fee for production of
industrial hemp shall be $250 plus $2 per acre. Moneys collected from license
fees shall be used to cover the costs of implementing, administering, and
enforcing this part.

(f) All licenses shall be valid for two years
from the date of issuance, after which the licensee shall renew the license and
pay the renewal fee, to be established by rules of the board.

(g) Any licensee who wishes to alter the
growing areas on which the licensee will conduct industrial hemp cultivation
shall, before altering the area, submit to the board an updated address, global
positioning system location, and map specifying the proposed alteration. If
the chairperson receives and approves the updated information, the chairperson
shall notify the licensee in writing that the licensee may cultivate industrial
hemp on the altered land area.

(h) A licensee that wishes to change the seed
cultivar grown shall submit to the chairperson the name of the new, approved
seed cultivar to be grown. If the chairperson receives and approves the change
to the seed cultivar, the chairperson shall notify the licensee that the licensee
may cultivate the new, approved seed cultivar.

(i) If the chairperson determines that the
requirements for a license pursuant to this part are satisfied, the chairperson
shall issue a license to the applicant. [L 2016, c 228, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next